Florida, session 2026, SB790.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 68 69 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFreedom to Learn 70 Act.â 71 Section 2.âSubsection (4) of section 1000.05, Florida 72 Statutes, is repealed. 73 Section 3.âSection 1000.071, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 74 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 75 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 76 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 77 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 78 powers and perform all duties listed below: 79 (8)âSTUDENT WELFARE.â 80 (c)1.âIn accordance with the rights of parents enumerated 81 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a 82 studentâs parent if there is a change in the studentâs services 83 or monitoring related to the studentâs mental, emotional, or 84 physical health or well-being and the schoolâs ability to 85 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the 86 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of 87 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control 88 of their children by requiring school district personnel to 89 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her 90 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of 91 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit 92 parents from accessing any of their studentâs education and 93 health records created, maintained, or used by the school 94 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2). 95 2.âA school district may not adopt procedures or student 96 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from 97 notifying a parent about his or her studentâs mental, emotional, 98 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related 99 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of 100 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such 101 information. School district personnel may not discourage or 102 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical 103 decisions affecting a studentâs mental, emotional, or physical 104 health or well-being. A school district may not adopt a 105 procedure that compels or authorizes school personnel to provide 106 such information to a parent if a reasonably prudent person 107 would believe that disclosure would result in harm to the 108 student, including, but not limited to, This subparagraph does 109 not prohibit a school district from adopting procedures that 110 permit school personnel to withhold such information from a 111 parent if a reasonably prudent person would believe that 112 disclosure would result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as 113 those terms are defined in s. 39.01. 114 3.âClassroom instruction by school personnel or third 115 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur 116 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss. 117 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in 118 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or 119 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with 120 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools. 121 4.âStudent support services training developed or provided 122 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to 123 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks 124 established by the Department of Education. 125 5.âAt the beginning of the school year, each school 126 district shall notify parents of each health care service 127 offered at their studentâs school and the option to withhold 128 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s. 129 1014.06. Parental consent to a health care service does not 130 waive the parentâs right to access his or her studentâs 131 educational or health records or to be notified about a change 132 in his or her studentâs services or monitoring as provided by 133 this paragraph. 134 4.6.âBefore administering a student well-being 135 questionnaire or health screening form to a student in 136 kindergarten through grade 3, the school district must provide 137 the questionnaire or health screening form to the parent and 138 obtain the permission of the parent. 139 5.7.âEach school district shall adopt procedures for a 140 parent to notify the principal, or his or her designee, 141 regarding concerns under this paragraph at his or her studentâs 142 school and the process for resolving those concerns within 7 143 calendar days after notification by the parent. 144 a.âAt a minimum, the procedures must require that within 30 145 days after notification by the parent that the concern remains 146 unresolved, the school district must either resolve the concern 147 or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the 148 concern. 149 b.âIf a concern is not resolved by the school district, a 150 parent may: 151 (I)âRequest the Commissioner of Education to appoint a 152 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good 153 standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 154 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 155 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or 156 practice, consider information provided by the school district, 157 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State 158 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request 159 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or 160 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled 161 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 162 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The 163 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school 164 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, 165 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph. 166 (II)âBring an action against the school district to obtain 167 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or 168 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A 169 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees 170 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or 171 injunctive relief. 172 c.âEach school district shall adopt and post on its website 173 policies to notify parents of the procedures required under this 174 subparagraph. 175 d.âNothing contained in this subparagraph shall be 176 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in 177 equity already existing under the common law or general law. 178 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 179 1001.706, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 180 1001.706âPowers and duties of the Board of Governors.â 181 (5)âPOWERS AND DUTIES RELATING TO ACCOUNTABILITY.â 182 (a)âThe Legislature intends that the Board of Governors 183 shall align the missions of each constituent university with the 184 academic success of its students; the existing and emerging 185 economic development needs of the state; the national reputation 186 of its faculty and its academic and research programs; the 187 quantity of externally generated research, patents, and 188 licenses; and the strategic and accountability plans required in 189 paragraphs (b) and (c). The Board of Governors shall 190 periodically review the mission of each constituent university 191 and make updates or revisions as needed. Upon completion of a 192 review of the mission, the board shall review existing academic 193 programs for alignment with the mission. The board shall include 194 in its review a directive to each constituent university 195 regarding its programs for any curriculum that violates s. 196 1000.05 or that is based on theories that systemic racism, 197 sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent in the 198 institutions of the United States and were created to maintain 199 social, political, and economic inequities. The mission 200 alignment and strategic plan must consider peer institutions at 201 the constituent universities. The mission alignment and 202 strategic plan must acknowledge that universities that have a 203 national and international impact have the greatest capacity to 204 promote the stateâs economic development through: new 205 discoveries, patents, licenses, and technologies that generate 206 state businesses of global importance; research achievements 207 through external grants and contracts that are comparable to 208 nationally recognized and ranked universities; the creation of a 209 resource rich academic environment that attracts high-technology 210 business and venture capital to the state; and this generationâs 211 finest minds focusing on solving the stateâs economic, social, 212 environmental, and legal problems in the areas of life sciences, 213 water, sustainability, energy, and health care. A nationally 214 recognized and ranked university that has a global perspective 215 and impact must be afforded the opportunity to enable and 216 protect the universityâs competitiveness on the global stage in 217 fair competition with other institutions of other states in the 218 highest Carnegie Classification. 219 Section 6.âSubsection (5) of section 1001.92, Florida 220 Statutes, is repealed. 221 Section 7.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 222 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (w) is 223 added to that subsection, to read: 224 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 225 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 226 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 227 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 228 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 229 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 230 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 231 approved methods of instruction, the following: 232 (g)1.âThe history of the Holocaust (1933-1945), the 233 systematic, planned annihilation of European Jews and other 234 groups by Nazi Germany, a watershed event in the history of 235 humanity, to be taught in a manner that leads to an 236 investigation of human behavior, an understanding of the 237 ramifications of prejudice, racism, and stereotyping, and an 238 examination of what it means to be a responsible and respectful 239 person, for the purposes of encouraging tolerance of diversity 240 in a pluralistic society and for nurturing and protecting 241 democratic values and institutions, including the policy, 242 definition, and historical and current examples of antisemitism, 243 as described in s. 1000.05(7) s. 1000.05(8), and the prevention 244 of antisemitism. Each school district must annually certify and 245 provide evidence to the department, in a manner prescribed by 246 the department, that the requirements of this paragraph are met. 247 The department shall prepare and offer standards and curriculum 248 for the instruction required by this paragraph and may seek 249 input from the Commissioner of Educationâs Task Force on 250 Holocaust Education or from any state or nationally recognized 251 Holocaust educational organizations. The department may contract 252 with any state or nationally recognized Holocaust educational 253 organizations to develop training for instructional personnel 254 and grade-appropriate classroom resources to support the 255 developed curriculum. 256 2.âThe second week in November shall be designated as 257 âHolocaust Education Weekâ in this state in recognition that 258 November is the anniversary of Kristallnacht, widely recognized 259 as a precipitating event that led to the Holocaust. 260 (w)âThe study of LGBTQ history in Florida and the LGBTQ 261 communityâs contributions to the United States, which may 262 include important United States Supreme Court cases, such as 263 Obergefell v. Hodges and Windsor v. United States; the Florida 264 Legislative Investigation Committee; and the tragedy at Pulse 265 Nightclub. 266 267 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 268 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 269 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 270 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 271 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 272 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 273 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 274 Section 8.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 275 1004.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 276 1004.04âPublic accountability and state approval for 277 teacher preparation programs.â 278 (2)âUNIFORM CORE CURRICULA AND CANDIDATE ASSESSMENT.â 279 (e)âTeacher preparation program courses: 280 1.âMay not distort significant historical events or include 281 a curriculum or instruction that teaches identity politics, 282 violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories that systemic 283 racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent in the 284 institutions of the United States and were created to maintain 285 social, political, and economic inequities. 286 2.âMust afford candidates the opportunity to think 287 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn 288 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence. 289 Section 9.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 1004.06, 290 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 291 1004.06âProhibited expenditures.â 292 (2)âA Florida College System institution, state university, 293 Florida College System institution direct-support organization, 294 or state university direct-support organization may, and is 295 encouraged to, develop programs and campus activities anchored 296 in the principles of diversity, equity, and inclusion. Programs 297 and courses may not expend any state or federal funds to 298 promote, support, or maintain any such programs or campus 299 activities that: 300 (a)âViolate s. 1000.05; or 301 (b)âAdvocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or 302 promote or engage in political or social activism, as defined by 303 rules of the State Board of Education and regulations of the 304 Board of Governors. 305 306 Student fees to support student-led organizations are permitted 307 notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by such 308 organizations which would otherwise violate this subsection, 309 provided that the public funds must be allocated to student-led 310 organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of 311 each Florida College System institution or state university, as 312 applicable. Use of institution facilities by student-led 313 organizations is permitted notwithstanding any speech or 314 expressive activity by such organizations which would otherwise 315 violate this subsection, provided that such use must be granted 316 to student-led organizations pursuant to written policies or 317 regulations of each Florida College System institution or state 318 university, as applicable. 319 (3)âSubsection (2) does not prohibit programs, campus 320 activities, or functions required for compliance with general or 321 federal laws or regulations; for obtaining or retaining 322 institutional or discipline-specific accreditation with the 323 approval of either the State Board of Education or the Board of 324 Governors; or for access programs for military veterans, Pell 325 Grant recipients, first generation college students, 326 nontraditional students, â2+2â transfer students from the 327 Florida College System, students from low-income families, or 328 students with unique abilities. 329 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 330 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 331 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 332 (2)(a)âPostsecondary institutions that are accredited or 333 approved as described in State Board of Education rule may seek 334 approval from the Department of Education to create educator 335 preparation institutes for the purpose of providing any or all 336 of the following: 337 1.âProfessional learning instruction to assist teachers in 338 improving classroom instruction and in meeting certification or 339 recertification requirements. 340 2.âInstruction to assist potential and existing substitute 341 teachers in performing their duties. 342 3.âInstruction to assist paraprofessionals in meeting 343 education and training requirements. 344 4.âInstruction for baccalaureate degree holders to become 345 certified teachers as provided in this section in order to 346 increase routes to the classroom for professionals who hold a 347 baccalaureate degree and college graduates who were not 348 education majors. 349 5.âInstruction and professional learning for part-time and 350 full-time nondegreed teachers of career programs under s. 351 1012.39(1)(c). 352 6.âInstruction that does not distort significant historical 353 events or include a curriculum or instruction that teaches 354 identity politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories 355 that systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are 356 inherent in the institutions of the United States and were 357 created to maintain social, political, and economic inequities. 358 Courses and instruction within the educator preparation 359 institute must afford candidates the opportunity to think 360 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn 361 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence. 362 Section 11.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (2) of 363 section 1006.28, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 364 1006.28âDuties of district school board, district school 365 superintendent; and school principal regarding K-12 366 instructional materials.â 367 (2)âDISTRICT SCHOOL BOARD.âThe district school board has 368 the constitutional duty and responsibility to select and provide 369 adequate instructional materials for all students in accordance 370 with the requirements of this part. The district school board 371 also has the following specific duties and responsibilities: 372 (a)âCourses of study; adoption.âAdopt courses of study, 373 including instructional materials, for use in the schools of the 374 district. 375 1.âEach district school board is responsible for the 376 content of all instructional materials and any other materials 377 used in a classroom, made available in a school or classroom 378 library, or included on a reading list, whether adopted and 379 purchased from the state-adopted instructional materials list, 380 adopted and purchased through a district instructional materials 381 program under s. 1006.283, or otherwise purchased or made 382 available. 383 2.âEach district school board must adopt a policy regarding 384 an objection by a parent or a resident of the county to the use 385 of a specific material, which clearly describes a process to 386 handle all objections and provides for resolution. The objection 387 form, as prescribed by State Board of Education rule, and the 388 district school boardâs process must be easy to read and 389 understand and be easily accessible on the homepage of the 390 school districtâs website. The objection form must also identify 391 the school district point of contact and contact information for 392 the submission of an objection. The process must provide the 393 parent or resident the opportunity to proffer evidence to the 394 district school board that: 395 a.âAn instructional material does not meet the criteria of 396 s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c) if it was selected for use in 397 a course or otherwise made available to students in the school 398 district but was not subject to the public notice, review, 399 comment, and hearing procedures under s. 1006.283(2)(b)8., 9., 400 and 11. 401 b.âAny material used in a classroom, made available in a 402 school or classroom library, or included on a reading list 403 contains content which: 404 (I)âIs pornographic or prohibited under s. 847.012; 405 (II)âDepicts or describes sexual conduct as defined in s. 406 847.001(19), unless such material is for a course required by s. 407 1003.46 or s. 1003.42(2)(o)1.g. or 3., or identified by State 408 Board of Education rule; 409 (III)âIs not suited to student needs and their ability to 410 comprehend the material presented; or 411 (III)(IV)âIs inappropriate for the grade level and age 412 group for which the material is used. 413 414 A resident of the county who is not the parent or guardian of a 415 student with access to school district materials may not object 416 to more than one material per month. The State Board of 417 Education may adopt rules to implement this provision. Any 418 material that is subject to an objection on the basis of sub 419 sub-subparagraph b.(I) or sub-sub-subparagraph b.(II) must be 420 removed within 5 school days after receipt of the objection and 421 remain unavailable to students of that school until the 422 objection is resolved. Parents shall have the right to read 423 passages from any material that is subject to an objection. If 424 the school board denies a parent the right to read passages due 425 to content that meets the requirements under sub-sub 426 subparagraph b.(I), the school district shall discontinue the 427 use of the material in the school district. If the district 428 school board finds that any material meets the requirements 429 under sub-subparagraph a. or that any other material contains 430 prohibited content under sub-sub-subparagraph b.(I), the school 431 district shall discontinue use of the material. If the district 432 school board finds that any other material contains prohibited 433 content under sub-sub-subparagraphs b.(II)-(IV), the school 434 district shall discontinue use of the material for any grade 435 level or age group for which such use is inappropriate or 436 unsuitable. 437 3.âEach district school board must establish a process by 438 which the parent of a public school student or a resident of the 439 county may contest the district school boardâs adoption of a 440 specific instructional material. The parent or resident must 441 file a petition, on a form provided by the school board, within 442 30 calendar days after the adoption of the instructional 443 material by the school board. The school board shall must make 444 the form available to the public and publish the form on the 445 school districtâs website. The form must be signed by the parent 446 or resident, include the required contact information, and state 447 the objection to the instructional material based on the 448 criteria of s. 1006.31(2) or s. 1006.40(3)(c). Within 30 days 449 after the 30-day period has expired, the school board must, for 450 all petitions timely received, conduct at least one open public 451 hearing before an unbiased and qualified hearing officer. The 452 hearing officer may not be an employee or agent of the school 453 district. The hearing is not subject to the provisions of 454 chapter 120; however, the hearing must provide sufficient 455 procedural protections to allow each petitioner an adequate and 456 fair opportunity to be heard and present evidence to the hearing 457 officer. The school boardâs decision after convening a hearing 458 is final and not subject to further petition or review. 459 4.âMeetings of committees convened for the purpose of 460 ranking, eliminating, or selecting instructional materials for 461 recommendation to the district school board must be noticed and 462 open to the public in accordance with s. 286.011. Any committees 463 convened for such purposes must include parents of students who 464 will have access to such materials. 465 5.âMeetings of committees convened for the purpose of 466 resolving an objection by a parent or resident to specific 467 materials must be noticed and open to the public in accordance 468 with s. 286.011. Any committees convened for such purposes must 469 include parents of students who will have access to such 470 materials. 471 6.âIf a parent disagrees with the determination made by the 472 district school board on the objection to the use of a specific 473 material, a parent may request the Commissioner of Education to 474 appoint a special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar 475 in good standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 476 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 477 relating to the school districtâs determination, consider 478 information provided by the parent and the school district, and 479 render a recommended decision for resolution to the State Board 480 of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request by the 481 parent. The State Board of Education must approve or reject the 482 recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled meeting 483 that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 days after 484 the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The costs of 485 the special magistrate shall be borne by the school district. 486 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, including forms, 487 necessary to implement this subparagraph. 488 (d)âSchool library media services; establishment and 489 maintenance.âEstablish and maintain a program of school library 490 media services for all public schools in the district, including 491 school library media centers, or school library media centers 492 open to the public, and, in addition to such traveling or 493 circulating libraries as may be needed for the proper operation 494 of the district school system. School librarians, media 495 specialists, and other personnel involved in the selection of 496 school district library materials must complete the training 497 program developed pursuant to s. 1006.29(6) before reviewing and 498 selecting age-appropriate materials and library resources. Upon 499 written request, a school district shall provide access to any 500 material or book specified in the request that is maintained in 501 a district school system library and is available for review. 502 1.âEach book made available to students through a school 503 district library media center or included in a recommended or 504 assigned school or grade-level reading list must be selected by 505 a school district employee who holds a valid educational media 506 specialist certificate, regardless of whether the book is 507 purchased, donated, or otherwise made available to students. 508 2.âEach district school board shall adopt procedures for 509 developing library media center collections and post the 510 procedures on the website for each school within the district. 511 School library media centers may provide materials and 512 information presenting all points of view on current and 513 historical issues. Materials may not be proscribed or removed 514 because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. The procedures 515 must: 516 a.âRequire that book selections meet the criteria in s. 517 1006.40(3)(c). 518 b.âRequire consultation of reputable, professionally 519 recognized reviewing periodicals and school community 520 stakeholders. 521 c.âProvide for library media center collections, including 522 classroom libraries, based on reader interest, support of state 523 academic standards and aligned curriculum, and the academic 524 needs of students and faculty. 525 d.âProvide for the regular removal or discontinuance of 526 books based on, at a minimum, physical condition, rate of recent 527 circulation, alignment to state academic standards and relevancy 528 to curriculum, out-of-date content, and required removal 529 pursuant to subparagraph (a)2. 530 3.âEach elementary school must publish on its website, in a 531 searchable format prescribed by the department, a list of all 532 materials maintained and accessible in the school library media 533 center or a classroom library or required as part of a school or 534 grade-level reading list. 535 4.âEach district school board shall adopt and publish on 536 its website the process for a parent to limit his or her 537 studentâs access to materials in the school or classroom 538 library. 539 Section 12.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 540 1007.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 541 1007.25âGeneral education courses; common prerequisites; 542 other degree requirements.â 543 (3)âThe chair of the State Board of Education and the chair 544 of the Board of Governors, or their designees, shall jointly 545 appoint faculty committees to review and recommend to the 546 Articulation Coordinating Committee for approval by the State 547 Board of Education and the Board of Governors statewide general 548 education core course options for inclusion in the statewide 549 course numbering system established under s. 1007.24. Faculty 550 committees shall, by July 1, 2024, and by July 1 every 4 years 551 thereafter, review and submit recommendations to the 552 Articulation Coordinating Committee and the commissioner for the 553 removal, alignment, realignment, or addition of general 554 education core courses that satisfy the requirements of this 555 subsection. 556 (c)âGeneral education core courses may not distort 557 significant historical events or include a curriculum that 558 teaches identity politics, violates s. 1000.05, or is based on 559 theories that systemic racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege 560 are inherent in the institutions of the United States and were 561 created to maintain social, political, and economic inequities. 562 Section 13.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) and paragraph 563 (b) of subsection (8) of section 1012.56, Florida Statutes, are 564 amended to read: 565 1012.56âEducator certification requirements.â 566 (7)âTYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.â 567 (a)âThe Department of Education shall issue a professional 568 certificate for a period not to exceed 5 years to any applicant 569 who fulfills one of the following: 570 1.âMeets all the applicable requirements outlined in 571 subsection (2). 572 2.âFor a professional certificate covering grades 6 through 573 12: 574 a.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 575 (h). 576 b.âHolds a masterâs or higher degree in the area of 577 science, technology, engineering, or mathematics. 578 c.âTeaches a high school course in the subject of the 579 advanced degree. 580 d.âIs rated highly effective as determined by the teacherâs 581 performance evaluation under s. 1012.34, based in part on 582 student performance as measured by a statewide, standardized 583 assessment or an Advanced Placement, Advanced International 584 Certificate of Education, or International Baccalaureate 585 examination. 586 e.âAchieves a passing score on the Florida professional 587 education competency examination required by state board rule. 588 3.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 589 (h) and completes a professional learning certification program 590 approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (8)(b) (8)(c) 591 or an educator preparation institute approved by the department 592 pursuant to s. 1004.85. An applicant who completes one of these 593 programs and is rated highly effective as determined by his or 594 her performance evaluation under s. 1012.34 is not required to 595 take or achieve a passing score on the professional education 596 competency examination in order to be awarded a professional 597 certificate. 598 599 At least 1 year before an individualâs temporary certificate is 600 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the 601 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will 602 expire and provide a list of each method by which the 603 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed. 604 (8)âPROFESSIONAL LEARNING CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.â 605 (b)âProfessional learning certification program courses: 606 1.âMay not distort significant historical events or include 607 curriculum or instruction that teaches identity politics, 608 violates s. 1000.05, or is based on theories that systemic 609 racism, sexism, oppression, and privilege are inherent in the 610 institutions of the United States and were created to maintain 611 social, political, and economic inequities. 612 2.âMust afford candidates the opportunity to think 613 critically, achieve mastery of academic program content, learn 614 instructional strategies, and demonstrate competence. 615 Section 14.âSubsection (4) of section 1012.562, Florida 616 Statutes, is amended to read: 617 1012.562âPublic accountability and state approval of school 618 leader preparation programs.âThe Department of Education shall 619 establish a process for the approval of Level I and Level II 620 school leader preparation programs that will enable aspiring 621 school leaders to obtain their certificates in educational 622 leadership under s. 1012.56. School leader preparation programs 623 must be competency-based, aligned to the principal leadership 624 standards adopted by the state board, and open to individuals 625 employed by public schools, including charter schools and 626 virtual schools. Level I programs lead to initial certification 627 in educational leadership for the purpose of preparing 628 individuals to serve as school administrators. Level II programs 629 build upon Level I training and lead to renewal certification as 630 a school principal. 631 (4)âPROGRAM PROHIBITIONS; REQUIREMENTS.â 632 (a)âSchool leader preparation programs may not distort 633 significant historical events or include curriculum or 634 instruction that teaches identity politics, violates s. 1000.05, 635 or is based on theories that systemic racism, sexism, 636 oppression, and privilege are inherent in the institutions of 637 the United States and were created to maintain social, 638 political, and economic inequities. 639 (b)âSchool leader preparation programs must afford 640 candidates the opportunity to demonstrate mastery of program 641 content, including instructional leadership strategies, coaching 642 development, school safety, and continuous improvement efforts. 643 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.